Utah statutes.
63G-6-602 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Certification of change order.

Under a construction contract, any change order which increases the contract amount shall be subject to prior written certification that the change order is within the determined project or contract budget.  The certification shall be made by the fiscal officer of the entity responsible for funding the project or the contract or other official responsible for monitoring and reporting upon the status of the costs of the total project or contract budget.  If the certification discloses a resulting increase in the total project or contract budget, the procurement officer shall not execute or make the change order unless sufficient funds are available or the scope of the project or contract is adjusted to permit the degree of completion feasible within the total project or contract budget as it existed prior to the change order under consideration.  However, with respect to the validity, as to the contractor, of any executed change order upon which the contractor has reasonably relied, it shall be presumed that there has been compliance with the provisions of this section.

